District of Columbia statutes.
34-1801

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

Repealed.

(2)

“Commission” means the Public Service Commission of the District of Columbia.

(2A)

“Consumer” means an individual who purchases prepaid wireless telecommunications service in a retail transaction for any purpose other than resale.

(3)

“Fund” means the Emergency and Non-Emergency Number Telephone Calling Systems Fund established under § 34-1802.

(4)

“Local exchange carrier” means a person that is engaged in the provision of local exchange service or exchange access.

(5)

“Local exchange service” means a telecommunications service provided within an exchange area.

(6)

“Person” means an individual, corporation, company, association, joint-stock company, association, firm, partnership, or other entity.

(6A)

“Prepaid wireless E911 charge” means the charge that is required to be collected by a seller from a consumer in the amount established under § 34-1803.02.

(6B)

“Prepaid wireless telecommunications service” means a commercial mobile radio service, as defined by § 20.3 of Title 47 of the Code of Federal Regulations, that allows a caller to dial 911 to access the 911 system, which service must be paid for in advance and is sold in predetermined units or dollars of which the number declines with use in a known amount.

(6C)

“Provider” means a person that provides prepaid wireless telecommunications service pursuant to a license issued by the Federal Communications Commission.

(7)

“Public safety answering point” means an answering location for 911 and 311 calls originating in a given area.

(7A)

“Retail transaction” means the purchase of prepaid wireless telecommunications service from a seller for any purpose other than resale.

(8)

“Reverse 911 system” means a capability that allows the Metropolitan Police Department to forward a pre-recorded message to residents and businesses within a designated geographical area.

(8A)

“Seller” means a person who sells prepaid wireless telecommunications service to another person.

(9)

Repealed.

(10)

“911 system” means:

(A)

Equipment for connecting and out-switching a 911 call originating within a local exchange carrier’s local exchange service;

(B)

Trunking facilities from a local exchange carrier to a public safety answering point;

(C)

Equipment necessary for routing a 911 call to a public safety answering point;

(D)

Facilities and staff needed to operate a call answering center;

(E)

A 311 system; and

(F)

A reverse 911 system.

(11)

“311 system” means a telephone system that is used to reduce emergency telephone call congestion by diverting non-emergency calls from the emergency telephone lines.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 602, 47 DCR 6308
Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 502(a), 50 DCR 5668
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 3002(a), 57 DCR 6242
This section is referenced in § 1-327.53.
Section 607 of D.C. Law 13-172 provided: “Except for section 606, this title shall apply as of October 1, 2000.”
D.C. Law 15-39 repealed pars. (1) and (9).
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 602 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90-day) authorization of applicability of section, see § 609 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 602 to 605, 607, of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 502(a) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 502(a) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3002(a) of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).

Short title of title V of Law 15-39: Section 501 of D.C. Law 15-39 provided that title V of the act may be cited as the Emergency and Non-Emergency Number Telephone Calling Systems Fund Amendment Act of 2003.

Short title: Section 3001 of D.C. Law 18-223 provided that subtitle A of title III of the act may be cited as the “Prepaid Wireless E911 Charge Amendment Act of 2010”.

Delegation of Mayor’s Authority under Title VI of D.C. Law 13-172, the “Emergency and Non-Emergency Number Telephone Calling Systems Fund Act of 2000”, see Mayor’s Order 2004-165, September 24, 2004 ( 51 DCR 9750).
Delegation of Authority pursuant to the Emergency and Non-Emergency Number Telephone Calling Systems Fund Act of 2000 and Section 3208 of the Office of Unified Communications Establishment Act of 2004, see Mayor’s Order 2009-85, May 27, 2009 ( 56 DCR 6826).

Applicability: Section 504 of D.C. Law 15-39 provided: Section 502 shall apply as of October 1, 2003.”

Section 3003 of D.C. Law 18-223 provided: “Sec. 3003. Applicability. This subtitle shall apply as of October 1, 2010.”